Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly to restrict land use to protect and preserve natural resources, environment, and vital areas of state, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. II.

Classification of certain dogs as hunting dogs, §

4-8-1.2

.

Department of Conservation and Natural Resources generally, T. 12.

Directing persons to leave parks, historic sites, or recreational areas when refusing to abide by rules and regulations, §

12-3-10

.

Jurisdiction over Game and Fish Code misdemeanor violations, §

15-9-30.3

.

Cruelty to animals, §

16-12-4

.

Watercraft safety, § 52-7-1 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Saltwater fishing regulations, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Coastal Resources, Subject 391-2-4.

Law reviews.

For article discussing important cases applying natural resource and game and fish laws in 1976 to 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 131 (1977).